Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Chapter 89. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Secs. 21.89.010 — 21.89.035.
[Renumbered as AS 21.96.010 — 21.96.035.]

Sec. 21.89.040.
Eye care under health and accident insurance. [Repealed, § 60 ch 38 SLA 2002.]

Secs. 21.89.050 — 21.89.070.
[Renumbered as AS 21.96.050 — 21.96.070.]

Sec. 21.89.071.
Insurance tax credit for gifts to Alaska veterans’ memorial endowment fund. [Repealed, § 25 ch. 46 SLA 2002.]

Secs. 21.89.075 — 21.89.110.
[Renumbered as AS 21.96.075 — 21.96.110.]